test/src/morphology/N-keel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kēļ: # Noun 215 'eng /est keel/fin' - full paradigm
     kēļ+N+Sg+Nom: kēļ
     kēļ+N+Sg+Gen: kīel
     kēļ+N+Sg+Par: kīeldõ
     kēļ+N+Sg+Dat: kīelõn
     kēļ+N+Sg+Ins: kīelkõks
     kēļ+N+Sg+Ill: kīelõ
     kēļ+N+Sg+Ela: kīelstõ
     kēļ+N+Pl+Nom: kīeld
     kēļ+N+Pl+Gen: kīeld
     kēļ+N+Pl+Par: kēļi
     kēļ+N+Pl+Dat: kīeldõn
     kēļ+N+Pl+Ins: kīeldkõks
     kēļ+N+Pl+Ill: kēļiž
     kēļ+N+Pl+Ela: kēļšti
